Florida, session 2026, HB1159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
55
56 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
57 39.0138, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
58 39.0138 Criminal history and other records checks; limit
59 on placement of a child.—
60 (3) The department may not place a child with a person
61 other than a parent if the criminal history records check
62 reveals that the person has been convicted of any felony that
63 falls within any of the following categories:
64 (c) Child sexual abuse material pornography or other
65 felony in which a child was a victim of the offense; or
66 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 92.56, Florida
67 Statutes, is amended to read:
68 92.56 Judicial proceedings and court records involving
69 sexual offenses and human trafficking.—
70 (3) The state may use a pseudonym instead of the victim's
71 name to designate the victim of a crime described in s.
72 787.06(3)(a)1., (c)1., or (e)1., in s. 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f),
73 or (g), or in chapter 794 or chapter 800, or of child abuse,
74 aggravated child abuse, or sexual performance by a child as
75 described in chapter 827, or any crime involving the production,
Page 3 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
76 possession, or promotion of child sexual abuse material
77 pornography as described in chapter 847, in all court records
78 and records of court proceedings, both civil and criminal.
79 Section 3. Section 92.561, Florida Statutes, is amended to
80 read:
81 92.561 Prohibition on reproduction of child sexual abuse
82 material pornography.—
83 (1) In a criminal proceeding, any property or material
84 that portrays sexual performance by a child as defined in s.
85 827.071, constitutes generated child sexual abuse material
86 pornography as defined in s. 827.072, or constitutes child
87 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, must
88 remain secured or locked in the care, custody, and control of a
89 law enforcement agency, the state attorney, or the court.
90 (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule of court, a court
91 shall deny, in a criminal proceeding, any request by the
92 defendant to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce
93 any property or material that portrays sexual performance by a
94 child, constitutes generated child sexual abuse material
95 pornography, or constitutes child sexual abuse material
96 pornography so long as the state attorney makes the property or
97 material reasonably available to the defendant.
98 (3) For purposes of this section, property or material is
99 deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if the state
100 attorney provides ample opportunity at a designated facility for
Page 4 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
101 the inspection, viewing, and examination of the property or
102 material that portrays sexual performance by a child,
103 constitutes generated child sexual abuse material pornography,
104 or constitutes child sexual abuse material pornography by the
105 defendant, his or her attorney, or any individual whom the
106 defendant uses as an expert during the discovery process or at a
107 court proceeding.
108 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
109 435.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
110 435.07 Exemptions from disqualification.—Unless otherwise
111 provided by law, the provisions of this section apply to
112 exemptions from disqualification for disqualifying offenses
113 revealed pursuant to background screenings required under this
114 chapter, regardless of whether those disqualifying offenses are
115 listed in this chapter or other laws.
116 (4)
117 (c) Disqualification from employment under this chapter
118 may not be removed from, and an exemption may not be granted to,
119 any current or prospective child care personnel, as defined in
120 s. 402.302(3), and such a person is disqualified from employment
121 as child care personnel, regardless of any previous exemptions
122 from disqualification, if the person has been registered as a
123 sex offender as described in 42 U.S.C. s. 9858f(c)(1)(C) or has
124 been arrested for and is awaiting final disposition of, has been
125 convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of guilty or
Page 5 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
126 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, or has been
127 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or
128 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following
129 provisions of state law or a similar law of another
130 jurisdiction:
131 1. A felony offense prohibited under any of the following
132 statutes:
133 a. Chapter 741, relating to domestic violence.
134 b. Section 782.04, relating to murder.
135 c. Section 782.07, relating to manslaughter; aggravated
136 manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled adult; aggravated
137 manslaughter of a child; or aggravated manslaughter of an
138 officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical technician, or a
139 paramedic.
140 d. Section 784.021, relating to aggravated assault.
141 e. Section 784.045, relating to aggravated battery.
142 f. Section 787.01, relating to kidnapping.
143 g. Section 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a
144 child.
145 h. Section 787.04(2), relating to leading, taking,
146 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or
147 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending
148 custody proceedings.
149 i. Section 787.04(3), relating to leading, taking,
150 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or
Page 6 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
151 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending
152 dependency proceedings or proceedings concerning alleged abuse
153 or neglect of a minor.
154 j. Section 794.011, relating to sexual battery.
155 k. Former s. 794.041, relating to sexual activity with or
156 solicitation of a child by a person in familial or custodial
157 authority.
158 l. Section 794.05, relating to unlawful sexual activity
159 with certain minors.
160 m. Section 794.08, relating to female genital mutilation.
161 n. Section 806.01, relating to arson.
162 o. Section 826.04, relating to incest.
163 p. Section 827.03, relating to child abuse, aggravated
164 child abuse, or neglect of a child.
165 q. Section 827.04, relating to contributing to the
166 delinquency or dependency of a child.
167 r. Section 827.071, relating to sexual performance by a
168 child.
169 s. Chapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material
170 pornography.
171 t. Chapter 893, relating to a drug abuse prevention and
172 control offense, if that offense was committed in the preceding
173 5 years.
174 u. Section 985.701, relating to sexual misconduct in
175 juvenile justice programs.
Page 7 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
176 2. A misdemeanor offense prohibited under any of the
177 following statutes:
178 a. Section 784.03, relating to battery, if the victim of
179 the offense was a minor.
180 b. Section 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a
181 child.
182 c. Chapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material
183 pornography.
184 3. A criminal act committed in another state or under
185 federal law which, if committed in this state, constitutes an
186 offense prohibited under any statute listed in subparagraph 1.
187 or subparagraph 2.
188 Section 5. Paragraph (aa) of subsection (5) of section
189 456.074, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
190 456.074 Certain health care practitioners; immediate
191 suspension of license.—
192 (5) The department shall issue an emergency order
193 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is
194 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring
195 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of
196 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar
197 offenses in another jurisdiction:
198 (aa) Section 847.0137, relating to the transmission of
199 child sexual abuse material pornography by electronic device or
200 equipment.
Page 8 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
201 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsection
202 (2) of section 775.0847, Florida Statutes, are amended and
203 subsection (3) of that section is republished to read:
204 775.0847 Possession or promotion of certain images of
205 child sexual abuse material pornography; reclassification.—
206 (1) For purposes of this section:
207 (b) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
208 1. Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
209 or
210 2. Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
211 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
212 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
213 (2) A violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137,
214 or s. 847.0138 shall be reclassified to the next higher degree
215 as provided in subsection (3) if:
216 (a) The offender possesses 10 or more images of any form
217 of child sexual abuse material pornography regardless of
218 content; and
219 (b) The content of at least one image contains one or more
220 of the following:
221 1. A child who is younger than the age of 12 5.
222 2. Sadomasochistic abuse involving a child.
223 3. Sexual battery involving a child.
224 4. Sexual bestiality involving a child.
225 5. Any motion picture, film, video, or computer-generated
Page 9 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
226 motion picture, film, or video involving a child, regardless of
227 length and regardless of whether the motion picture, film,
228 video, or computer-generated motion picture, film, or video
229 contains sound.
230 (3)(a) In the case of a felony of the third degree, the
231 offense is reclassified to a felony of the second degree.
232 (b) In the case of a felony of the second degree, the
233 offense is reclassified to a felony of the first degree.
234
235 For purposes of sentencing under chapter 921 and determining
236 incentive gain-time eligibility under chapter 944, a felony
237 offense that is reclassified under this section is ranked one
238 level above the ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 of the
239 offense committed.
240 Section 7. Subsection (1) of section 794.0116, Florida
241 Statutes, is amended to read:
242 794.0116 Sexual offenses by persons previously convicted
243 of sexual offenses.—
244 (1) A person who was previously convicted of or had
245 adjudication withheld for an offense specified in s.
246 943.0435(1)(h)1.a. and commits a violation of s. 800.04(5); s.
247 825.1025(3); s. 827.071(2), (3), (4), or (5)(a); s. 847.0135; s.
248 847.0137; or s. 847.0145 shall be sentenced to a mandatory
249 minimum term of imprisonment as follows:
250
Page 10 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
Statute Mandatory Minimum
251
(a) 800.04(5) 15 10 years
252
(b) 825.1025(3) 10 years
253
(c) 827.071(2) 30 20 years
254
(d) 827.071(3) 20 years
255
(e) 827.071(4) 15 years
256
(f) 827.071(5)(a) 10 years
257
(g) 847.0135 10 years
258
(h) 847.0137 10 years
259
(i) 847.0145 30 20 years
260
261 Section 8. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1), subsections
262 (2), (3), and (4), and paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of
263 section 827.071, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection
264 (7) is added to that section, to read:
265 827.071 Sexual performance by a child; child sexual abuse
Page 11 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
266 material pornography; penalties.—
267 (1) As used in this section, the following definitions
268 shall apply:
269 (b) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
270 1. Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
271 or
272 2. Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
273 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
274 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
275 (2)(a) A person is guilty of the use of a child in a
276 sexual performance if, knowing the character and content
277 thereof, he or she employs, authorizes, or induces a child to
278 engage in a sexual performance or, being a parent, legal
279 guardian, or custodian of such child, consents to the
280 participation by such child in a sexual performance. A person
281 who violates this paragraph subsection commits a felony of the
282 first second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
283 775.083, or s. 775.084. Except as provided in subsection (7), a
284 person 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense who
285 is convicted of a violation of this paragraph must be sentenced
286 to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 15 years.
287 (b) A person is guilty of aggravated use of a child in a
288 sexual performance if, knowing the character and content
289 thereof, he or she employs, authorizes, or induces a child
290 younger than 12 years of age to engage in a sexual performance.
Page 12 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
291 A person who violates this paragraph commits a life felony,
292 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
293 A person 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense who
294 is convicted of a violation of this paragraph must be sentenced
295 to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years.
296 (3) A person is guilty of promoting a sexual performance
297 by a child when, knowing the character and content thereof, he
298 or she produces, directs, or promotes any performance which
299 includes sexual conduct by a child. A person who violates this
300 subsection commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as
301 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. Except as
302 provided in subsection (7), a person 18 years of age or older at
303 the time of the offense who is convicted of a violation of this
304 subsection must be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
305 imprisonment of 5 years.
306 (4) It is unlawful for any person to possess with the
307 intent to promote any photograph, motion picture, exhibition,
308 show, representation, or other presentation which, in whole or
309 in part, includes child sexual abuse material pornography. The
310 possession of three or more copies of such photograph, motion
311 picture, representation, or presentation is prima facie evidence
312 of an intent to promote. A person who violates this subsection
313 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in
314 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
315 (5)(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly solicit,
Page 13 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
316 possess, control, or intentionally view a photograph, motion
317 picture, exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer
318 depiction, or other presentation which, in whole or in part, he
319 or she knows to include child sexual abuse material pornography.
320 The solicitation, possession, control, or intentional viewing of
321 each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition, show, image,
322 data, computer depiction, representation, or presentation is a
323 separate offense. If such photograph, motion picture,
324 exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer
325 depiction, or other presentation includes child sexual abuse
326 material pornography depicting more than one child, then each
327 such child in each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition,
328 show, representation, image, data, computer depiction, or other
329 presentation that is knowingly solicited, possessed, controlled,
330 or intentionally viewed is a separate offense. A person who
331 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the second third
332 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
333 775.084.
334 (7) A court is not required to impose a mandatory minimum
335 term of imprisonment for a violation of this section if the
336 court makes the following written findings related to the sexual
337 performance that forms the basis of the violation:
338 (a) The child depicted in the sexual performance was 14
339 years of age or older at the time the sexual performance was
340 created;
Page 14 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
341 (b) The sexual performance was created with the depicted
342 child's permission;
343 (c) The offender was not more than 4 years older than the
344 depicted child at the time the sexual performance was created;
345 and
346 (d) The offender did not promote the sexual performance to
347 any third party.
348 Section 9. Section 827.072, Florida Statutes, is amended
349 to read:
350 827.072 Generated child sexual abuse material
351 pornography.—
352 (1) As used in this section, the term:
353 (a) "Generated child sexual abuse material pornography"
354 means any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
355 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other computer-generated
356 means to portray a fictitious person, who a reasonable person
357 would regard as being a real person younger than 18 years of
358 age, engaged in sexual conduct.
359 (b) "Intentionally view" has the same meaning as in s.
360 827.071.
361 (c) "Sexual conduct" has the same meaning as in s.
362 827.071.
363 (d) "Transmit" has the same meaning as in s. 847.0137.
364 (2)(a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly possess or
365 control or intentionally view a photograph, a motion picture, a
Page 15 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
366 representation, an image, a data file, a computer depiction, or
367 any other presentation which, in whole or in part, he or she
368 knows includes generated child sexual abuse material
369 pornography. The possession, control, or intentional viewing of
370 each such photograph, motion picture, representation, image,
371 data file, computer depiction, or other presentation is a
372 separate offense. A person who violates this paragraph commits a
373 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
374 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
375 (b)1. Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person
376 in this state who knew or reasonably should have known that he
377 or she was transmitting generated child sexual abuse material to
378 another person in this state or in another jurisdiction commits
379 a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
380 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
381 2. Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person in
382 any jurisdiction other than this state who knew or reasonably
383 should have known that he or she was transmitting generated
384 child sexual abuse material to any person in this state commits
385 a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
386 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
387 3. A person is subject to prosecution in this state
388 pursuant to chapter 910 for any act or conduct proscribed by
389 this paragraph, including a person in a jurisdiction other than
390 this state, if the act or conduct violates subparagraph 2.
Page 16 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
391 (c) A person who intentionally creates generated child
392 sexual abuse material pornography commits a felony of the second
393 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
394 or s. 775.084.
395 (d)(c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to any material
396 possessed, controlled, or intentionally viewed as part of a law
397 enforcement investigation.
398 Section 10. Section 828.126, Florida Statutes, is amended
399 to read:
400 828.126 Sexual activities involving animals.—
401 (1) As used in this section, the term "sexual contact with
402 an animal" means any act committed between a person and an
403 animal for the purpose of sexual gratification, abuse, or
404 financial gain which involves:
405 (a) Contact between the sex organ or anus of one and the
406 mouth, sex organ, or anus of the other;
407 (b) The fondling of the sex organ or anus of an animal; or
408 (c) The insertion, however slight, of any part of the body
409 of a person or any object into the vaginal or anal opening of an
410 animal, or the insertion of any part of the body of an animal
411 into the vaginal or anal opening of a person.
412 (2) A person may not:
413 (a) knowingly engage in any sexual contact with an animal.
414 A person who violates this subsection commits a felony of the
415 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
Page 17 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
416 or s. 775.084.;
417 (3)(b) A person may not knowingly cause, aid, or abet
418 another person to engage in any sexual contact with an animal. A
419 person who violates this subsection commits a felony of the
420 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
421 or s. 775.084.;
422 (4)(c) A person may not knowingly permit any sexual
423 contact with an animal to be conducted on any premises under his
424 or her charge or control. A person who violates this subsection
425 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in
426 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.;
427 (5)(d) A person may not knowingly organize, promote,
428 conduct, aid, abet, participate in as an observer, or advertise,
429 offer, solicit, or accept an offer of an animal for the purpose
430 of sexual contact with such animal, or perform any service in
431 the furtherance of an act involving any sexual contact with an
432 animal. A person who violates this subsection commits a felony
433 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
434 775.083, or s. 775.084.; or
435 (6)(e) A person may not knowingly film, distribute, or
436 possess any pornographic image or video of a person and an
437 animal engaged in any of the activities prohibited by this
438 section.
439 (3) A person who violates this subsection section commits
440 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
Page 18 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
441 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
442 (7)(4) In addition to other penalties prescribed by law,
443 the court shall issue an order prohibiting a person convicted
444 under this section from harboring, owning, possessing, or
445 exercising control over any animal; from residing in any
446 household in which animals are present; and from engaging in an
447 occupation, whether paid or unpaid, or participating in a
448 volunteer position at any establishment at which animals are
449 present. The order shall may be effective for at least up to 5
450 years after the date of the conviction, regardless of whether
451 adjudication is withheld.
452 (8)(5) This section does not apply to accepted animal
453 husbandry practices, including, but not limited to, bona fide
454 agricultural purposes, assistance with the birthing process or
455 artificial insemination of an animal for reproductive purposes,
456 accepted conformation judging practices, or accepted veterinary
457 medical practices.
458 Section 11. Subsection (11) of section 836.13, Florida
459 Statutes, is amended to read:
460 836.13 Altered sexual depictions; prohibited acts;
461 penalties; applicability.—
462 (11) Prosecution of a person for an offense under this
463 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this
464 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including
465 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this
Page 19 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
466 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse
467 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual
468 exploitation of children.
469 Section 12. Subsection (9) of section 836.14, Florida
470 Statutes, is amended to read:
471 836.14 Theft or unauthorized promotion of a sexually
472 explicit image.—
473 (9) Prosecution of a person for an offense under this
474 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this
475 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including
476 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this
477 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse
478 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual
479 exploitation of children.
480 Section 13. Subsection (3) of section 847.001, Florida
481 Statutes, is amended to read:
482 847.001 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
483 (3) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
484 (a) Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
485 or
486 (b) Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
487 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
488 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
489 Section 14. Section 847.002, Florida Statutes, is amended
490 to read:
Page 20 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
491 847.002 Child sexual abuse material pornography
492 prosecutions.—
493 (1) Any law enforcement officer who, pursuant to a
494 criminal investigation, recovers images or movies of child
495 sexual abuse material pornography shall:
496 (a) Provide such images or movies to the law enforcement
497 agency representative assigned to the Child Victim
498 Identification Program at the National Center for Missing and
499 Exploited Children, as required by the center's guidelines.
500 (b) Request the law enforcement agency contact information
501 from the Child Victim Identification Program for any images or
502 movies recovered which contain an identified victim of child
503 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03.
504 (c) Provide case information to the Child Victim
505 Identification Program, as required by the National Center for
506 Missing and Exploited Children guidelines, in any case where the
507 law enforcement officer identifies a previously unidentified
508 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography.
509 (2) Any law enforcement officer submitting a case for
510 prosecution which involves the production, promotion, or
511 possession of child sexual abuse material pornography shall
512 submit to the designated prosecutor the law enforcement agency
513 contact information provided by the Child Victim Identification
514 Program at the National Center for Missing and Exploited
515 Children, for any images or movies involved in the case which
Page 21 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
516 contain the depiction of an identified victim of child sexual
517 abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03.
518 (3) In every filed case involving an identified victim of
519 child sexual abuse material pornography, as defined in s.
520 960.03, the prosecuting agency shall enter the following
521 information into the Victims in Child Pornography Tracking
522 Repeat Exploitation database maintained by the Office of the
523 Attorney General:
524 (a) The case number and agency file number.
525 (b) The named defendant.
526 (c) The circuit court division and county.
527 (d) Current court dates and the status of the case.
528 (e) Contact information for the prosecutor assigned.
529 (f) Verification that the prosecutor is or is not in
530 possession of a victim impact statement and will use the
531 statement in sentencing.
532 Section 15. Subsection (5) of section 847.011, Florida
533 Statutes, is amended, subsection (12) is added to that section,
534 and subsections (1) through (4) and (6) through (11) of that
535 section are republished, to read:
536 847.011 Prohibition of certain acts in connection with
537 obscene, lewd, etc., materials; penalty.—
538 (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c), any person who
539 knowingly sells, lends, gives away, distributes, transmits,
540 shows, or transmutes, or offers to sell, lend, give away,
Page 22 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
541 distribute, transmit, show, or transmute, or has in his or her
542 possession, custody, or control with intent to sell, lend, give
543 away, distribute, transmit, show, transmute, or advertise in any
544 manner, any obscene book, magazine, periodical, pamphlet,
545 newspaper, comic book, story paper, written or printed story or
546 article, writing, paper, card, picture, drawing, photograph,
547 motion picture film, figure, image, phonograph record, or wire
548 or tape or other recording, or any written, printed, or recorded
549 matter of any such character which may or may not require
550 mechanical or other means to be transmuted into auditory,
551 visual, or sensory representations of such character, or any
552 article or instrument for obscene use, or purporting to be for
553 obscene use or purpose; or who knowingly designs, copies, draws,
554 photographs, poses for, writes, prints, publishes, or in any
555 manner whatsoever manufactures or prepares any such material,
556 matter, article, or thing of any such character; or who
557 knowingly writes, prints, publishes, or utters, or causes to be
558 written, printed, published, or uttered, any advertisement or
559 notice of any kind, giving information, directly or indirectly,
560 stating, or purporting to state, where, how, of whom, or by what
561 means any, or what purports to be any, such material, matter,
562 article, or thing of any such character can be purchased,
563 obtained, or had; or who in any manner knowingly hires, employs,
564 uses, or permits any person knowingly to do or assist in doing
565 any act or thing mentioned above, commits a misdemeanor of the
Page 23 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
566 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
567 775.083. A person who, after having been convicted of a
568 violation of this subsection, thereafter violates any of its
569 provisions, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
570 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
571 (b) The knowing possession by any person of three or more
572 identical or similar materials, matters, articles, or things
573 coming within the provisions of paragraph (a) is prima facie
574 evidence of the violation of the paragraph.
575 (c) A person who commits a violation of paragraph (a) or
576 subsection (2) which is based on materials that depict a minor
577 engaged in any act or conduct that is harmful to minors commits
578 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
579 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
580 (d) A person's ignorance of a minor's age, a minor's
581 misrepresentation of his or her age, a bona fide belief of a
582 minor's age, or a minor's consent may not be raised as a defense
583 in a prosecution for one or more violations of paragraph (a) or
584 subsection (2).
585 (2) Except as provided in paragraph (1)(c), a person who
586 knowingly has in his or her possession, custody, or control any
587 obscene book, magazine, periodical, pamphlet, newspaper, comic
588 book, story paper, written or printed story or article, writing,
589 paper, card, picture, drawing, photograph, motion picture film,
590 film, any sticker, decal, emblem or other device attached to a
Page 24 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
591 motor vehicle containing obscene descriptions, photographs, or
592 depictions, any figure, image, phonograph record, or wire or
593 tape or other recording, or any written, printed, or recorded
594 matter of any such character which may or may not require
595 mechanical or other means to be transmuted into auditory,
596 visual, or sensory representations of such character, or any
597 article or instrument for obscene use, or purporting to be for
598 obscene use or purpose, without intent to sell, lend, give away,
599 distribute, transmit, show, transmute, or advertise the same,
600 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
601 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. A person who, after having
602 been convicted of violating this subsection, thereafter violates
603 any of its provisions commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
604 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. In any
605 prosecution for such possession, it is not necessary to allege
606 or prove the absence of such intent.
607 (3) No person shall as a condition to a sale, allocation,
608 consignment, or delivery for resale of any paper, magazine,
609 book, periodical, or publication require that the purchaser or
610 consignee receive for resale any other article, paper, magazine,
611 book, periodical, or publication reasonably believed by the
612 purchaser or consignee to be obscene, and no person shall deny
613 or threaten to deny or revoke any franchise or impose or
614 threaten to impose any penalty, financial or otherwise, by
615 reason of the failure of any person to accept any such article,
Page 25 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
616 paper, magazine, book, periodical, or publication, or by reason
617 of the return thereof. Whoever violates this subsection is
618 guilty of a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided
619 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
620 (4) Any person who knowingly promotes, conducts, performs,
621 or participates in an obscene show, exhibition, or performance
622 by live persons or a live person before an audience is guilty of
623 a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
624 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any person who, after having been
625 convicted of violating this subsection, thereafter violates any
626 of its provisions and is convicted thereof is guilty of a felony
627 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
628 775.083, or s. 775.084.
629 (5)(a) 1. A person may not knowingly sell, lend, give
630 away, distribute, transmit, show, or transmute; offer to sell,
631 lend, give away, distribute, transmit, show, or transmute; have
632 in his or her possession, custody, or control; have in his or
633 her possession, custody, or control with the intent to sell,
634 lend, give away, distribute, transmit, show, or transmute; or
635 advertise in any manner an obscene, child-like sex doll.
636 (b) 2.a. Except as provided in paragraph (c) sub-
637 subparagraph b., a person who violates this paragraph (a)
638 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in
639 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
640 (c) b. A person who is convicted of violating this
Page 26 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
641 paragraph (a) a second or subsequent time commits a felony of
642 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
643 775.083, or s. 775.084.
644 (b)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., a person who
645 knowingly has in his or her possession, custody, or control an
646 obscene, child-like sex doll commits a misdemeanor of the first
647 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
648 2. A person who is convicted of violating this paragraph a
649 second or subsequent time commits a felony of the third degree,
650 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
651 (c)1. A law enforcement officer may arrest without a
652 warrant any person who he or she has probable cause to believe
653 has violated paragraph (b).
654 2. Upon proper affidavits being made, a search warrant may
655 be issued to further investigate a violation of paragraph (b),
656 including to search a private dwelling.
657 (6) Every act, thing, or transaction forbidden by this
658 section shall constitute a separate offense and shall be
659 punishable as such.
660 (7) Proof that a defendant knowingly committed any act or
661 engaged in any conduct referred to in this section may be made
662 by showing that at the time such act was committed or conduct
663 engaged in the defendant had actual knowledge of the contents or
664 character of the material, matter, article, or thing possessed
665 or otherwise dealt with, by showing facts and circumstances from
Page 27 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
666 which it may fairly be inferred that he or she had such
667 knowledge, or by showing that he or she had knowledge of such
668 facts and circumstances as would put a person of ordinary
669 intelligence and caution on inquiry as to such contents or
670 character.
671 (8) There shall be no right of property in any of the
672 materials, matters, articles, or things possessed or otherwise
673 dealt with in violation of this section; and, upon the seizure
674 of any such material, matter, article, or thing by any
675 authorized law enforcement officer, the same shall be held by
676 the arresting agency. When the same is no longer required as
677 evidence, the prosecuting officer or any claimant may move the
678 court in writing for the disposition of the same and, after
679 notice and hearing, the court, if it finds the same to have been
680 possessed or otherwise dealt with in violation of this section,
681 shall order the sheriff to destroy the same in the presence of
682 the clerk; otherwise, the court shall order the same returned to
683 the claimant if the claimant shows that he or she is entitled to
684 possession. If destruction is ordered, the sheriff and clerk
685 shall file a certificate of compliance.
686 (9)(a) The circuit court has jurisdiction to enjoin a
687 threatened violation of this section upon complaint filed by the
688 state attorney or attorney for a municipality in the name of the
689 state upon the relation of such state attorney or attorney for a
690 municipality.
Page 28 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
691 (b) After the filing of such a complaint, the judge to
692 whom it is presented may grant an order restraining the person
693 complained of until final hearing or further order of the court.
694 Whenever the relator state attorney or attorney for a
695 municipality requests a judge of such court to set a hearing
696 upon an application for such a restraining order, such judge
697 shall set such hearing for a time within 3 days after the making
698 of such request. No such order shall be made unless such judge
699 is satisfied that sufficient notice of the application therefor
700 has been given to the party restrained of the time when and
701 place where the application for such restraining order is to be
702 made; however, such notice shall be dispensed with when it is
703 manifest to such judge, from the sworn allegations of the
704 complaint or the affidavit of the plaintiff or other competent
705 person, that the apprehended violation will be committed if an
706 immediate remedy is not afforded.
707 (c) The person sought to be enjoined shall be entitled to
708 a trial of the issues within 1 day after joinder of issue, and a
709 decision shall be rendered by the court within 2 days of the
710 conclusion of the trial.
711 (d) In any action brought as provided in this subsection,
712 no bond or undertaking shall be required of the state attorney
713 or the municipality or its attorney before the issuance of a
714 restraining order provided for by paragraph (b), and there shall
715 be no liability on the part of the state or the state attorney
Page 29 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
716 or the municipality or its attorney for costs or for damages
717 sustained by reason of such restraining order in any case where
718 a final decree is rendered in favor of the person sought to be
719 enjoined.
720 (e) Every person who has possession, custody, or control
721 of, or otherwise deals with, any of the materials, matters,
722 articles, or things described in this section, after the service
723 upon him or her of a summons and complaint in an action for
724 injunction brought under this subsection, is chargeable with
725 knowledge of the contents and character thereof.
726 (10) The several sheriffs and state attorneys shall
727 vigorously enforce this section within their respective
728 jurisdictions.
729 (11) This section shall not apply to the exhibition of
730 motion picture films permitted by s. 847.013.
731 (12) Prosecution of a person for an offense under this
732 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this
733 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including
734 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this
735 section or any other crime punishing the sexual performance or
736 the sexual exploitation of children.
737 Section 16. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 847.01357,
738 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
739 847.01357 Exploited children's civil remedy.—
740 (1) Any person who, while under the age of 18, was a
Page 30 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
741 victim of a sexual abuse crime listed in chapter 794, chapter
742 800, chapter 827, or chapter 847, where any portion of such
743 abuse was used in the production of child sexual abuse material
744 pornography, and who suffers personal or psychological injury as
745 a result of the production, promotion, or possession of such
746 images or movies, may bring an action in an appropriate state
747 court against the producer, promoter, or possessor of such
748 images or movies, regardless of whether the victim is now an
749 adult. In any action brought under this section, a prevailing
750 plaintiff shall recover the actual damages such person sustained
751 and the cost of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees.
752 Any victim who is awarded damages under this section shall be
753 deemed to have sustained damages of at least $150,000.
754 (4) It is not a defense to a civil cause of action under
755 this section that the respondent did not know the victim or
756 commit the abuse depicted in any image of child sexual abuse
757 material pornography.
758 Section 17. Section 847.0137, Florida Statutes, is amended
759 to read:
760 847.0137 Transmission of child sexual abuse material
761 pornography by electronic device or equipment prohibited;
762 penalties.—
763 (1) As used in this section, the term:
764 (a) "Access credential" means any password, username,
765 token, unique link, uniform resource locator (URL), hyperlink,
Page 31 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
766 or other data that enables a user to access a digital file or
767 other data in cloud storage.
768 (b) "Child sexual abuse material" has the same meaning as
769 in s. 847.001.
770 (c) "Cloud storage" means any remote, networked, or third-
771 party provided storage service that enables a user to store,
772 host, or share a digital file or other data and to access such a
773 digital file or other data via the Internet or other network,
774 whether by direct file transfer, access credential, link, or
775 other similar means.
776 (d) "Link" means any uniform resource locater (URL),
777 hyperlink, short link, shareable link, magnet link, or other
778 string, token, or data that, when used, directs or grants a user
779 access to a digital file or other data that is stored remotely,
780 including in cloud storage.
781 (e) "Transmit" means the act of sending and causing to be
782 delivered, including the act of providing access for receiving
783 and causing to be delivered, any image, information, or data
784 over or through any medium, including the Internet or an
785 interconnected network, by use of any electronic equipment or
786 other device. The term also includes the act of providing access
787 to any image, information, or data in cloud storage by sharing,
788 publishing, or otherwise making available a link, access
789 credential, or other similar means by which another person may
790 access, view, or obtain such image, information, or data.
Page 32 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
791 (2) Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person
792 in this state who knew or reasonably should have known that he
793 or she was transmitting child sexual abuse material pornography,
794 as defined in s. 847.001, to another person in this state or in
795 another jurisdiction commits a felony of the second third
796 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
797 775.084. Except as provided in subsection (7), a person 18 years
798 of age or older at the time of the offense who is convicted of a
799 violation of this subsection must be sentenced to a mandatory
800 minimum term of imprisonment of 5 years.
801 (3) Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person
802 in any jurisdiction other than this state who knew or reasonably
803 should have known that he or she was transmitting child sexual
804 abuse material pornography, as defined in s. 847.001, to any
805 person in this state commits a felony of the second third
806 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
807 775.084. Except as provided in subsection (7), a person 18 years
808 of age or older at the time of the offense who is convicted of a
809 violation of this subsection must be sentenced to a mandatory
810 minimum term of imprisonment of 5 years.
811 (4) A person may not be prosecuted under this section for
812 providing a link, access credential, or other information, in
813 good faith, to a law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority,
814 or authorized forensic examiner for the purpose of reporting
815 suspected child sexual abuse material, cooperating with an
Page 33 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
816 investigation, preserving evidence, or seeking lawful removal of
817 content.
818 (5)(4) This section shall not be construed to preclude
819 prosecution of a person in this state or another jurisdiction
820 for a violation of any law of this state, including a law
821 providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this section,
822 for the transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography,
823 as defined in s. 847.001, to any person in this state.
824 (6)(5) A person is subject to prosecution in this state
825 pursuant to chapter 910 for any act or conduct proscribed by
826 this section, including a person in a jurisdiction other than
827 this state, if the act or conduct violates subsection (3).
828 (7) A court is not required to impose a mandatory minimum
829 term of imprisonment for a violation of this section if the
830 court makes the following written findings related to the image
831 that forms the basis of the violation:
832 (a) The child depicted in the image was 14 years of age or
833 older at the time the image was created;
834 (b) The image was created with the depicted child's
835 permission;
836 (c) The offender was not more than 4 years older than the
837 depicted child at the time the image was created; and
838 (d) The offender did not transmit the image to any third
839 party.
840
Page 34 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
841 The provisions of this section do not apply to subscription-
842 based transmissions such as list servers.
843 Section 18. Section 847.0139, Florida Statutes, is amended
844 to read:
845 847.0139 Immunity from civil liability for reporting child
846 sexual abuse material pornography, transmission of child sexual
847 abuse material pornography, or any image, information, or data
848 harmful to minors to a minor in this state.—Any person who
849 reports to a law enforcement officer what the person reasonably
850 believes to be child sexual abuse material pornography,
851 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or any
852 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor
853 in this state may not be held civilly liable for such reporting.
854 For purposes of this section, such reporting may include
855 furnishing the law enforcement officer with any image,
856 information, or data that the person reasonably believes to be
857 evidence of child sexual abuse material pornography,
858 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or an
859 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor
860 in this state.
861 Section 19. Paragraph (g) of subsection (6) of section
862 903.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
863 903.011 Pretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform
864 bond schedule.—
865 (6) A person may not be released before his or her first
Page 35 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
866 appearance hearing or bail determination and a judge must
867 determine the appropriate bail, if any, based on an
868 individualized consideration of the criteria in s. 903.046(2),
869 if the person meets any of the following criteria:
870 (g) The person's current offense of arrest is for one or
871 more of the following crimes:
872 1. A capital felony, life felony, felony of the first
873 degree, or felony of the second degree;
874 2. A homicide under chapter 782; or any attempt,
875 solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a homicide;
876 3. Assault in furtherance of a riot or an aggravated riot;
877 felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation; domestic
878 violence, as defined in s. 741.28; stalking; mob intimidation;
879 assault or battery on a law enforcement officer; assault or
880 battery on juvenile probation officer, or other staff of a
881 detention center or commitment facility, or a staff member of a
882 commitment facility, or health services personnel; assault or
883 battery on a person 65 years of age or older; robbery; burglary;
884 carjacking; or resisting an officer with violence;
885 4. Kidnapping, false imprisonment, human trafficking, or
886 human smuggling;
887 5. Possession of a firearm or ammunition by a felon,
888 violent career criminal, or person subject to an injunction
889 against committing acts of domestic violence, stalking, or
890 cyberstalking;
Page 36 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
891 6. Sexual battery; indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching;
892 exposure of sexual organs; incest; luring or enticing a child;
893 or child sexual abuse material pornography;
894 7. Abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an elderly person or
895 disabled adult;
896 8. Child abuse or aggravated child abuse;
897 9. Arson; riot, aggravated riot, inciting a riot, or
898 aggravated inciting a riot; or a burglary or theft during a
899 riot;
900 10. Escape; tampering or retaliating against a witness,
901 victim, or informant; destruction of evidence; or tampering with
902 a jury;
903 11. Any offense committed for the purpose of benefiting,
904 promoting, or furthering the interests of a criminal gang;
905 12. Trafficking in a controlled substance, including
906 conspiracy to engage in trafficking in a controlled substance;
907 13. Racketeering; or
908 14. Failure to appear at required court proceedings while
909 on bail.
910 Section 20. Paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (3)
911 of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
912 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
913 ranking chart.—
914 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
915 (e) LEVEL 5
Page 37 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
916
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
917
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
918
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
919
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
vehicle with suspended license,
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
920
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
Page 38 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
921
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
922
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
tags; possession of forged,
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
Page 39 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
923
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
924
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
925
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
926
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
927
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
928
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
misleading, or incomplete
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
929
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
Page 40 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
930
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
931
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
932
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
933
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, or use of firearms
in violent manner.
934
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
935
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
936
Page 41 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
937
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
938
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
939
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
940
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
941
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
942
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
943
Page 42 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
944
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
945
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
946
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
947
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
948
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
949
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
950
Page 43 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
951
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
952
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
953
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
$100,000.
954
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
false statements regarding
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
955
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
Page 44 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
956
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
957
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
skimming device, or reencoder.
958
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
959
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
960
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
Page 45 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
consent.
961
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
962
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
violence.
963
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
964
847.0137 3rd Transmission of pornography by
(2) & (3) electronic device or equipment.
965
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
966
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
Page 46 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
967
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
968
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
969
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
Page 47 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
970
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
971
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
religious services or a
specified business site.
972
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
public housing facility.
Page 48 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
973
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
974
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
975
976 (f) LEVEL 6
977
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
978
316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash
involving serious bodily
injury.
979
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent
conviction.
980
316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding.
981
327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving
serious bodily injury; leaving
Page 49 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
scene.
982
400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering
services requiring licensure,
without a license.
983
499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction
history, transaction
information, or transaction
statement.
984
499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of
prescription drug from
unauthorized person.
985
499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of
prescription drug to
unauthorized person.
986
775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law
enforcement officer.
987
784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly
weapon without intent to kill.
988
Page 50 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to
commit felony.
989
784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic
battery by strangulation.
990
784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible
threat.
991
784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person
under 16.
992
784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law
enforcement officer.
993
784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
994
784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person
65 years of age or older.
995
784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified
official or employee.
996
Page 51 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
997
784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code
inspector.
998
787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining
with purpose other than those
in s. 787.01.
999
787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child.
1000
790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon
on school property.
1001
790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw
destructive device with intent
to do bodily harm or damage
property.
1002
790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, act of arson or
violence to state property, or
Page 52 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
use of firearms in violent
manner.
1003
790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly
missiles into dwellings,
vessels, or vehicles.
1004
794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to
participate in sexual activity
by custodial adult.
1005
794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with
specified minor.
1006
800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but less than 16 years of age;
offender less than 18 years.
1007
800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
1008
806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily
harm to firefighter or any
Page 53 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
other person.
1009
810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
1010
810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
1011
812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or
more, but less than $100,000,
grand theft in 2nd degree.
1012
812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree;
firearm.
1013
812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000
or more; coordination of
others.
1014
812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen
$750 or more; second or
subsequent conviction.
1015
812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated
Page 54 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
property stolen within 120 days
is $3,000 or more; coordination
of others.
1016
812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
1017
812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons and use of social media
platform.
1018
812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other
weapon (strong-arm robbery).
1019
817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia
with intent to create cloned
cellular telephones.
1020
817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false
report of a crime resulting in
death.
1021
817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more
patients.
Page 55 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1022
817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value $10,000
or more, but less than $50,000.
1023
825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
1024
825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
1025
825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation
of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
1026
825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at less than $10,000.
1027
827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child.
1028
827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child.
1029
827.071(5) 2nd Possess, control, or
3rd intentionally view any
Page 56 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes
child sexual abuse material
pornography.
1030
828.126(4), (5) 3rd Sexual activities involving
& (6) animals.
828.126(3)
1031
836.05 2nd Threats; extortion.
1032
836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats
to kill, do bodily injury, or
conduct a mass shooting or an
act of terrorism.
1033
843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to
escape.
1034
847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to
distribute, or possessing with
intent to distribute obscene
materials depicting minors.
1035
847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the
Page 57 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
production of materials harmful
to minors.
1036
847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of
or with a minor or the visual
depiction of such conduct.
1037
847.0137(2) & 2nd Transmitting child sexual abuse
(3) material.
1038
893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled
substances resulting in
overdose or serious bodily
injury.
1039
914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, with
bodily injury.
1040
918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence relating to a
capital felony.
1041
944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery
upon or inflicting cruel or
Page 58 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
inhuman treatment on an inmate
or offender on community
supervision, resulting in great
bodily harm.
1042
944.40 2nd Escapes.
1043
944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding
escaped prisoners.
1044
944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband
(firearm, weapon, or explosive)
into correctional facility.
1045
951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced
into county detention facility.
1046
1047 (g) LEVEL 7
1048
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1049
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
1050
Page 59 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
1051
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
1052
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
bodily injury.
1053
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
1054
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
1055
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
Page 60 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
1056
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
1057
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
1058
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
1059
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
1060
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
1061
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
1062
462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without
a license.
Page 61 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1063
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
1064
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
1065
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
1066
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
hygiene without a license.
1067
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
1068
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
1069
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
1070
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
Page 62 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1071
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
1072
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
1073
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
there were five or more
victims.
1074
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
1075
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
1076
Page 63 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
1077
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
1078
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
1079
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
1080
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
1081
Page 64 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
1082
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
1083
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
1084
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
1085
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
1086
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
Page 65 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1087
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
1088
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
1089
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
1090
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
1091
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
65 years of age or older.
1092
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
1093
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
1094
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
Page 66 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
inspector.
1095
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
1096
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
1097
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
1098
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
1099
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
1100
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
Page 67 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1101
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
1102
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
attempting to commit a felony.
1103
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
of mass destruction.
1104
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
1105
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
1106
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
Page 68 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
1107
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
1108
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
1109
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
years of age.
1110
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
1111
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
Page 69 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
1112
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
1113
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
1114
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1115
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1116
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
1117
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
Page 70 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
1118
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
theft in 2nd degree.
1119
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
grand theft.
1120
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
authorized emergency vehicle.
1121
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
1122
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
1123
Page 71 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
1124
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
1125
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
1126
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
greater than $50,000.
1127
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
defraud.
1128
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
1129
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
1130
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
Page 72 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
1131
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
1132
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
vaccine with intent to defraud.
1133
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
1134
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
1135
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
Page 73 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
disfigurement.
1136
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
1137
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
1138
827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under
16 years of age by person 21
years of age or older.
1139
827.071(3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
827.071(2) & (3) sexual performance, or Promote
or direct sexual such
performance by a child.
1140
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child sexual abuse
material pornography.
Page 74 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1141
828.126 2nd Sexual activities involving
(2) & (3) animals.
1142
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
1143
838.015 2nd Bribery.
1144
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
1145
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
1146
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
1147
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
1148
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
1149
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
Page 75 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
officer or employee.
1150
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
1151
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
commit an unlawful sex act.
1152
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
1153
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
1154
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
1155
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
Page 76 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
1156
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
1157
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
1158
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
1159
Page 77 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
1160
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
1161
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
1162
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
1163
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1164
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
1165
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
Page 78 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1166
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1167
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1168
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
grams.
1169
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1170
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1171
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
Page 79 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1172
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1173
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
more, less than 500 grams.
1174
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
more, less than 1,000 grams.
1175
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
more, less than 100 grams.
1176
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
1177
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
Page 80 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
less than $20,000.
1178
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
1179
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1180
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
1181
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1182
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
Page 81 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
conceal a sexual offender.
1183
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1184
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1185
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1186
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1187
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
Page 82 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
registration information.
1188
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1189
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1190
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1191
1192 Section 21. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
1193 948.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1194 948.06 Violation of probation or community control;
1195 revocation; modification; continuance; failure to pay
1196 restitution or cost of supervision.—
1197 (8)
1198 (c) For purposes of this section, the term "qualifying
1199 offense" means any of the following:
Page 83 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1200 1. Kidnapping or attempted kidnapping under s. 787.01,
1201 false imprisonment of a child under the age of 13 under s.
1202 787.02(3), or luring or enticing a child under s. 787.025(2)(b)
1203 or (c).
1204 2. Murder or attempted murder under s. 782.04, attempted
1205 felony murder under s. 782.051, or manslaughter under s. 782.07.
1206 3. Aggravated battery or attempted aggravated battery
1207 under s. 784.045.
1208 4. Sexual battery or attempted sexual battery under s.
1209 794.011(2), (3), (4), or (8)(b) or (c).
1210 5. Lewd or lascivious battery or attempted lewd or
1211 lascivious battery under s. 800.04(4), lewd or lascivious
1212 molestation under s. 800.04(5)(b) or (c)2., lewd or lascivious
1213 conduct under s. 800.04(6)(b), lewd or lascivious exhibition
1214 under s. 800.04(7)(b), or lewd or lascivious exhibition on
1215 computer under s. 847.0135(5)(b).
1216 6. Robbery or attempted robbery under s. 812.13,
1217 carjacking or attempted carjacking under s. 812.133, or home
1218 invasion robbery or attempted home invasion robbery under s.
1219 812.135.
1220 7. Lewd or lascivious offense upon or in the presence of
1221 an elderly or disabled person or attempted lewd or lascivious
1222 offense upon or in the presence of an elderly or disabled person
1223 under s. 825.1025.
1224 8. Sexual performance by a child or attempted sexual
Page 84 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1225 performance by a child under s. 827.071.
1226 9. Computer pornography under s. 847.0135(2) or (3),
1227 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography under s.
1228 847.0137, or selling or buying of minors under s. 847.0145.
1229 10. Poisoning food or water under s. 859.01.
1230 11. Abuse of a dead human body under s. 872.06.
1231 12. Any burglary offense or attempted burglary offense
1232 that is either a first degree felony or second degree felony
1233 under s. 810.02(2) or (3).
1234 13. Arson or attempted arson under s. 806.01(1).
1235 14. Aggravated assault under s. 784.021.
1236 15. Aggravated stalking under s. 784.048(3), (4), (5), or
1237 (7).
1238 16. Aircraft piracy under s. 860.16.
1239 17. Unlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a
1240 destructive device or bomb under s. 790.161(2), (3), or (4).
1241 18. Treason under s. 876.32.
1242 19. Any offense committed in another jurisdiction which
1243 would be an offense listed in this paragraph if that offense had
1244 been committed in this state.
1245 Section 22. Paragraph (e) of subsection (3) and subsection
1246 (10) of section 960.03, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1247 960.03 Definitions; ss. 960.01-960.28.—As used in ss.
1248 960.01-960.28, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:
1249 (3) "Crime" means:
Page 85 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1250 (e) A violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137,
1251 or s. 847.0138, related to online sexual exploitation and child
1252 sexual abuse material pornography.
1253 (10) "Identified victim of child sexual abuse material
1254 pornography" means any person who, while under the age of 18, is
1255 depicted in any image or movie of child sexual abuse material
1256 pornography and who is identified through a report generated by
1257 a law enforcement agency and provided to the National Center for
1258 Missing and Exploited Children's Child Victim Identification
1259 Program.
1260 Section 23. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1261 960.197, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1262 960.197 Assistance to victims of online sexual
1263 exploitation and child sexual abuse material pornography.—
1264 (1) Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in s. 960.13
1265 for crime victim compensation awards, the department may award
1266 compensation for counseling and other mental health services to
1267 treat psychological injury or trauma to:
1268 (b) Any person who, while younger than age 18, was
1269 depicted in any image or movie, regardless of length, of child
1270 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, who
1271 has been identified by a law enforcement agency or the National
1272 Center for Missing and Exploited Children as an identified
1273 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography, who suffers
1274 psychiatric or psychological injury as a direct result of the
Page 86 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1159 2026 Legislature
1275 crime, and who does not otherwise sustain a personal injury or
1276 death.
1277 Section 24. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 87 of 87
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1159 -02-er